Vermont statutes. Title 11A Vermont Business Corporations
Subchapter 2. Voting

§ 7.20.
Shareholders’ list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its shareholders who are entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting. The list must be arranged by voting group (and within each voting group by class or series of shares) and show the address of and number of shares held by each shareholder.

The shareholders’ list must be made available for inspection by any shareholder, beginning two business days after notice of the meeting is given for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation’s principal office or at a place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A shareholder of record and entitled to vote at that meeting, his or her agent, or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the requirements of subsection 16.02(c) of this title, to copy the list, during regular business hours and at his or her expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the shareholders’ list available at the meeting, and any shareholder of record and entitled to vote at that meeting, his or her agent, or attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or at any adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a shareholder of record and entitled to vote at that meeting, his or her agent, or attorney to inspect the shareholders’ list before or at the meeting (or copy the list as permitted by subsection (b) of this section), the superior court of a county where a corporation’s principal office (or if none in this State, its registered office) is located, on application of the shareholder, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation’s expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

Refusal or failure to prepare or make available the shareholders’ list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting, unless a shareholder, or his or her agent or attorney objects on the record or in writing to such refusal or failure prior to such action having been taken. In the event of such refusal or failure, and such objection, the action taken at the meeting shall be negated unless:

the meeting is recessed for a period of not less than five days after the list is made available to the objecting party; or

the corporation petitions and the superior court declares that the corporation’s refusal or failure is in accordance with the law.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 7.21.
Voting entitlement of shares.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section or unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, each outstanding share, regardless of class, is entitled to one vote on each matter voted on at a shareholders’ meeting. Only shares are entitled to vote.

Absent special circumstances, the shares of a corporation are not entitled to vote if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to vote for directors of the second corporation.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not limit the power of a corporation to vote any shares, including its own shares, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.

Redeemable shares are not entitled to vote after notice of redemption is mailed to the holders and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank, trust company, or other financial institution under an irrevocable obligation to pay the holders the redemption price on surrender of the shares.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 7.22.
Proxies.

A shareholder may vote his or her shares in person or by proxy.

A shareholder may appoint a proxy to vote or otherwise act for him or her by:

signing an appointment form, either personally or by his or her attorney-in-fact; or

by transmitting to the corporation or the corporation’s duly authorized agent an appointment of a proxy by electronic transmission, including telephone or e-mail.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for 11 months unless a longer period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the shareholder unless the appointment form conspicuously states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

a pledgee;

a person who purchased or agreed to purchase the shares;

a creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

an employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

a party to a voting agreement created under section 7.31 or 20.12 of this title.

The death or incapacity of the shareholder appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy’s authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises his or her authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (d) of this section is revoked when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

A transferee for value of shares subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if he or she did not know of its existence when he or she acquired the shares and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the certificate representing the shares or on the information statement for shares without certificates.

Subject to section 7.24 of this title and to any express limitation on the proxy’s authority appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy’s vote or other action as that of the shareholder making the appointment.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2001, No. 26

, § 1.

§ 7.23.
Shares held by nominees.

A corporation may establish a procedure by which the beneficial owner of shares that are registered in the name of a nominee is recognized by the corporation as the shareholder. The extent of this recognition may be determined in the procedure.

The procedure may set forth:

the types of nominees to which it applies;

the rights or privileges that the corporation recognizes in a beneficial owner;

the manner in which the procedure is selected by the nominee;

the information that must be provided when the procedure is selected;

the period for which selection of the procedure is effective; and

other aspects of the rights and duties created.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 7.24.
Corporation’s acceptance of votes.

If the name signed or delivered by electronic transmission on a vote consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name signed or delivered by electronic transmission on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the name of its shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if:

the shareholder is an entity and the name signed or delivered by electronic transmission purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

the name signed or delivered by electronic transmission purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

the name signed or delivered by electronic transmission purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

the name signed or delivered by electronic transmission purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory’s authority to sign or deliver by electronic transmission for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

two or more persons are the shareholder as co-tenants or fiduciaries and the name signed or delivered by electronic transmission purports to be the name of at least one of the co-owners and the person signing or delivering by electronic transmission appears to be acting on behalf of all the co-owners.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of:

the signature on it;

the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder; or

the electronic transmission by which the proxy appointment was made.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994; amended

2001, No. 26

, § 2.

§ 7.25.
Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

Shares entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those shares exists with respect to that matter. Unless the articles of incorporation or this title provide for a greater quorum, a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter by the voting group constitutes a quorum of that voting group for action on that matter.

Once a share is represented for any purpose at a meeting, it is deemed present for quorum purposes for the remainder of the meeting and for any adjournment of that meeting unless a new record date is or must be set for that adjourned meeting.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter (other than the election of directors) by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the articles of incorporation or this title require a greater number of affirmative votes.

An amendment of the articles of incorporation adding, changing, or deleting a greater quorum or voting requirement for a voting group greater than specified in subsection (a) or (c) of this section is governed by section 7.27 of this title.

The election of directors is governed by section 7.28 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 7.26.
Action by single and multiple voting groups.

If the articles of incorporation or this title provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in section 7.25 of this title.

If the articles of incorporation or this title provide for voting by two or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter is taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in section 7.25 of this title. Action may be taken by one voting group on a matter even though no action is taken by another voting group entitled to vote on the matter.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 7.27.
Greater quorum or voting requirements.

The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater quorum or voting requirement for shareholders (or voting groups of shareholders) than is provided for by this title.

An amendment to the articles of incorporation that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement must meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

§ 7.28.
Voting for directors; cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the shares entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Shareholders do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the articles of incorporation so provide.

A statement included in the articles of incorporation that “(all) (a designated voting group of) shareholders are entitled to cumulate their votes for directors” (or words of similar import) means that the shareholders designated are entitled to multiply the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two or more candidates.

Shares otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not be voted cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

the meeting notice or proxy statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

a shareholder who has the right to cumulate his or her votes gives notice to the corporation not less than 48 hours before the time set for the meeting of his or her intent to cumulate his or her votes during the meeting, and if one shareholder gives this notice all other shareholders in the same voting group participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 85

, § 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.